Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 1. Offenses Related to Alcohol, Inhalants, and Controlled Substances; Implied Consent.
Sec. 28.35.031.
Implied consent.

A person who operates or drives a motor vehicle in this state or who operates an aircraft as defined in AS

28.35.030(w)

or who operates a watercraft as defined in AS

28.35.030(w)

shall be considered to have given consent to a chemical test or tests of the person’s breath for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content of the person’s blood or breath if lawfully arrested for an offense arising out of acts alleged to have been committed while the person was operating or driving a motor vehicle or operating an aircraft or a watercraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance or if lawfully arrested under AS

28.35.280

for the offense of minor operating a vehicle after consuming alcohol. The test or tests shall be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer who has probable cause to believe that the person was operating or driving a motor vehicle or operating an aircraft or a watercraft in this state while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance or that the person was a minor operating a vehicle after consuming alcohol.

A person who operates or drives a motor vehicle in this state or who operates an aircraft or watercraft shall be considered to have given consent to a preliminary breath test for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content of the person’s blood or breath. A law enforcement officer may administer a preliminary breath test at the scene of the incident if the officer has probable cause to believe that a person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft is impaired by the ingestion of alcoholic beverages and that the person

was operating or driving a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft that is involved in an accident;

committed a moving traffic violation or unlawfully operated an aircraft or watercraft; in this paragraph, “unlawfully” means in violation of any federal, state, or municipal statute, regulation, or ordinance, except for violations that do not provide reason to believe that the operator’s ability to operate the aircraft or watercraft was impaired by the ingestion of alcoholic beverages; or

was operating or driving a motor vehicle in violation of AS

28.35.029(a)

.

Before administering a preliminary breath test under (b) of this section, the officer shall advise the person that refusal may be used against the person in a civil or criminal action arising out of the incident and that refusal is an infraction. If the person refuses to submit to the test, the test shall not be administered.

The result of the test under (b) of this section may be used by the law enforcement officer to determine whether the driver or operator should be arrested.

Refusal to submit to a preliminary breath test at the request of a law enforcement officer is an infraction.

If a driver or operator is arrested, the provisions of (a) of this section apply. The preliminary breath test authorized in this section is in addition to any tests authorized under (a) of this section.

A person who operates or drives a motor vehicle in this state shall be considered to have given consent to a chemical test or tests of the person’s breath and blood for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content of the person’s breath and blood and shall be considered to have given consent to a chemical test or tests of the person’s blood and urine for the purpose of determining the presence of controlled substances in the person’s blood and urine if the person is involved in a motor vehicle accident that causes death or serious physical injury to another person. The test or tests may be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer who has probable cause to believe that the person was operating or driving a motor vehicle in this state that was involved in an accident causing death or serious physical injury to another person.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict searches or seizures under a warrant issued by a judicial officer, in addition to a test permitted under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 1969; am § 11 ch 129 SLA 1980; am § 16 ch 117 SLA 1982; am § 16 ch 77 SLA 1983; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 76 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 142 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 55 SLA 1994; am § 8 ch 143 SLA 1996; am § 12 ch 63 SLA 2001; am §§ 34 — 36 ch 60 SLA 2002)

Revisor's notes. —

The last clause of (b)(2) of this section was enacted as AS

28.35.031(g)

.
Reorganized in 1985.

In 1995, in subsection (a), “AS

28.35.030(o)

(2)” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(m)

(2)” and “AS

28.35.030(o)

(3)” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(m)

(3)” to reflect the 1995 relettering of AS 28.35.030(m) as AS 28.35.030(o).

In 2002, in subsection (a), “AS

28.35.030(r)

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(o)

” to reflect the 2002 relettering of AS

28.35.030(o)

.

In 2004, in subsection (a), “AS

28.35.030(t)

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(r)

” to reflect the 2004 relettering of AS

28.35.030(r)

as AS

28.35.030(t)

.

In 2008, in subsection (a), “AS

28.35.030(u)

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(t)

” to reflect the 2008 relettering of AS

28.35.030(t)

as AS

28.35.030(u)

.

In 2019, in subsection (a), “ AS

28.35.030(w)

” was substituted for “ AS

28.35.030(u)

” to reflect the 2019 relettering of
AS

28.35.030(u)

as AS

28.35.030(w)

.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning validity of breath test, see AS

28.90.020

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Intoximeter 3000, an infrared alcohol breath test apparatus, is a “chemical test” under this section. 1984 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

Sec. 28.35.032.
Refusal to submit to chemical test.

If a person under arrest for operating a motor vehicle or aircraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance refuses the request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS

28.33.031(a)(1)

or AS

28.35.031(a)

, or if a person involved in a motor vehicle accident that causes death or serious physical injury to another person refuses the request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS

28.33.031(a)(2)

or AS

28.35.031(g)

, after being advised by the officer that the refusal will result in the denial or revocation of the driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license, that the refusal may be used against the person in a civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of an act alleged to have been committed by the person while operating a motor vehicle or aircraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance, and that the refusal is a crime, a chemical test may not be given, except as provided by AS

28.35.035

. If a person under arrest for operating a watercraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance refuses the request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS

28.35.031(a)

, after being advised by the officer that the refusal may be used against the person in a civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of an act alleged to have been committed by the person while operating a watercraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance, and that the refusal is a crime, a chemical test may not be given, except as provided by AS

28.35.035

.

[Repealed, § 25 ch 77 SLA 1983.]

[Repealed, § 25 ch 77 SLA 1983.]

[Repealed, § 25 ch 77 SLA 1983.]

The refusal of a person to submit to a chemical test authorized under AS

28.33.031(a)

or AS

28.35.031(a)

or (g) is admissible evidence in a civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of an act alleged to have been committed by the person while operating or driving a motor vehicle or operating an aircraft or watercraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance.

Except as provided under (p) of this section, refusal to submit to a chemical test authorized by AS

28.33.031(a)

or AS

28.35.031(a)

or (g) is a class A misdemeanor.

Upon conviction under this section,

the court shall impose a minimum sentence of imprisonment of

not less than 72 consecutive hours, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of six months, and impose a fine of not less than $1,500 if the person has not been previously convicted;

not less than 20 days, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 12 months, and impose a fine of not less than $3,000 if the person has been previously convicted once;

not less than 60 days, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 18 months, and impose a fine of not less than $4,000 if the person has been previously convicted twice and is not subject to punishment under (p) of this section;

not less than 120 days, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 24 months, and impose a fine of not less than $5,000 if the person has been previously convicted three times and is not subject to punishment under (p) of this section;

not less than 240 days, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 30 months, and impose a fine of not less than $6,000 if the person has been previously convicted four times and is not subject to punishment under (p) of this section;

not less than 360 days, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 36 months, and impose a fine of not less than $7,000 if the person has been previously convicted more than four times and is not subject to punishment under (p) of this section;

the court may not

suspend execution of the sentence required by (1) of this subsection or grant probation, except on condition that the person

serve the minimum imprisonment under (1) of this subsection;

pay the minimum fine required under (1) of this subsection;

suspend imposition of sentence; or

suspend the requirement for an ignition interlock device;

the court shall revoke the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license under AS

28.15.181

, and may order that the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft that was used in commission of the offense be forfeited under AS

28.35.036

;

the court may order that the person, while incarcerated or as a condition of probation or parole, take a drug or combination of drugs intended to prevent the consumption of an alcoholic beverage; a condition of probation or parole imposed under this paragraph is in addition to any other condition authorized under another provision of law; and

the sentence imposed by the court under this subsection shall run consecutively with any other sentence of imprisonment imposed on the person.

Except as prohibited by federal law or regulation, every provider of treatment programs to which persons are ordered under this section shall supply the judge, prosecutor, defendant, and an agency involved in the defendant’s treatment with information and reports concerning the defendant’s past and present assessment, treatment, and progress. Information compiled under this subsection is confidential and may only be used in connection with court proceedings involving the defendant’s treatment, including use by a court in sentencing a person convicted under this section, or by an officer of the court in preparing a pre-sentence report for the use of the court in sentencing a person convicted under this section.

A person who is sentenced to imprisonment for 72 consecutive hours under (g) of this section and who is not released from imprisonment after 72 hours may not bring an action against the state or a municipality or its agents, officers, or employees for damages resulting from the additional period of confinement if

the employee or employees who released the person exercised due care and, in releasing the person, followed the standard release procedures of the prison facility; and

the additional period of confinement did not exceed 12 hours.

For purposes of this section, convictions under AS

28.33.030

or AS

28.35.030

and for refusal to submit to a chemical test under this section, if arising out of a single transaction and a single arrest, are considered one previous conviction.

Notwithstanding (g) of this section, the court may reduce the fine required to be imposed under (g) of this section by the cost of the ignition interlock device.

The court shall order a person convicted under this section to satisfy the screening, evaluation, referral, and program requirements of an alcohol safety action program if such a program is available in the community where the person resides, or a private or public treatment facility approved by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.37 to make referrals for rehabilitative treatment or to provide rehabilitative treatment. If a person is convicted under (p) of this section, the court shall order the person to be evaluated as required by this subsection before the court imposes sentence for the offense.

A program of inpatient treatment may be required by the authorized agency under (l) of this section only if authorized in the judgment, and may not exceed the maximum term of inpatient treatment specified in the judgment. A person who has been referred for inpatient treatment under this subsection may make a written request to the sentencing court asking the court to review the referral. The request for review shall be made within seven days of the agency’s referral, and shall specifically set out the grounds upon which the request for review is based. The court may order a hearing on the request for review.

If a person fails to satisfy the requirements of an authorized agency under (m) of this section, the court

may impose any portion of a suspended sentence; however, if the person was convicted under (p) of this section, the court shall impose a part or all of the remaining portion of any suspended sentence;

may punish the failure as contempt of the authority of the court under AS

09.50.010

or as a violation of a condition of probation; and

shall order the revocation or suspension of the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, and privilege to obtain a driver’s license until the requirements are satisfied.

Imprisonment required under (g)(1)(A) of this section shall be served at a community residential center or by electronic monitoring at a private residence under AS

33.30.065

. If a community residential center or electronic monitoring at a private residence is not available, imprisonment required under (g)(1)(A) of this section may be served at another appropriate place determined by the commissioner of corrections. Imprisonment required under (g)(1)(B) — (F) of this section may be served at a community residential center or at a private residence if approved by the commissioner of corrections. Imprisonment served at a private residence must include electronic monitoring under AS

33.30.065

. The cost of imprisonment resulting from the sentence imposed under (g)(1) of this section shall be paid to the state by the person being sentenced. The cost of imprisonment required to be paid under this subsection may not exceed $2,000. Upon the person’s conviction, the court shall include the costs of imprisonment as a part of the judgment of conviction. Except for reimbursement from a permanent fund dividend as provided in this subsection, payment of the cost of imprisonment is not required if the court determines the person is indigent. For costs of imprisonment that are not paid by the person as required by this subsection, the state shall seek reimbursement from the person’s permanent fund dividend as provided under AS

43.23.140

. A person sentenced under (g)(1)(B) of this section shall perform at least 160 hours of community service work, as required by the director of the community residential center or other appropriate place, or as required by the commissioner of corrections if the sentence is being served at a private residence. In this subsection, “appropriate place” means a facility with 24-hour on-site staff supervision that is specifically adapted to provide a residence, and includes a correctional center, residential treatment facility, hospital, halfway house, group home, work farm, work camp, or other place that provides varying levels of restriction.

A person is guilty of a class C felony if the person is convicted under this section and either has been previously convicted two or more times since January 1, 1996, and within the 10 years preceding the date of the present offense, or punishment under this subsection or under AS

28.35.030(n)

was previously imposed within the last 10 years. For purposes of determining minimum sentences based on previous convictions, the provisions of AS

28.35.030(w)(4)

apply. Upon conviction,

the court shall impose a fine of not less than $10,000, require the person to use an ignition interlock device after the person regains the privilege to operate a motor vehicle for a minimum of 60 months, and impose a minimum sentence of imprisonment of not less than

120 days if the person has been previously convicted twice;

240 days if the person has been previously convicted three times;

360 days if the person has been previously convicted four or more times;

the court may not

suspend execution of the sentence required by (1) of this subsection or grant probation, except on condition that the person

serve the minimum imprisonment under (1) of this subsection;

pay the minimum fine required under (1) of this subsection;

suspend imposition of sentence; or

suspend the requirements for an ignition interlock device;

the court shall permanently revoke the person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license subject to restoration under (q) of this section;

the court may order that the person, while incarcerated or as a condition of probation or parole, take a drug, or combination of drugs intended to prevent consumption of an alcoholic beverage; a condition of probation or parole imposed under this paragraph is in addition to any other condition authorized under another provision of law;

the sentence imposed by the court under this subsection shall run consecutively with any other sentence of imprisonment imposed on the person;

the court shall order forfeiture under AS

28.35.036

, of the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft used in the commission of the offense, subject to remission under AS

28.35.037

; and

the court shall order the department to revoke the registration for any vehicle registered by the department in the name of the person convicted under this subsection; if a person convicted under this subsection is a registered co-owner of a vehicle, the department shall reissue the vehicle registration and omit the name of the person convicted under this subsection.

Upon request, the department shall review a driver’s license revocation imposed under (p)(3) of this section and, unless the revocation was ordered in a case in which the person was also convicted of a crime under AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.210

,

11.41.280

,

11.41.282

, or a similar law in another jurisdiction or the revocation was ordered under AS

28.35.030(u)

or (v), may restore the driver’s license if

the license has been revoked for a period of at least 10 years;

the person has not been convicted of a driving-related criminal offense or a felony in the 10 years preceding the request for restoration of the license; and

the person provides proof of financial responsibility.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 56 SLA 2006.]

For purposes of this section, the director of the division within the department responsible for administration of this section or a person designated by the director may request and receive criminal justice information available under AS 12.62.

Notwithstanding (g) or (p) of this section, the court shall waive the requirement of the use of an ignition interlock device when a person operates a motor vehicle in a community included on the list published by the department under AS

28.22.011(b)

.

In this section,

“cost of imprisonment” means the cost of imprisonment as determined under AS

28.35.030

(l);

“previously convicted” has the meaning given in AS

28.35.030

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 1969; am § 28 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 12 ch 129 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 117 SLA 1982; am §§ 17 — 20, 25 ch 77 SLA 1983; am § 17 ch 60 SLA 1986; am §§ 6, 7 ch 57 SLA 1989; am §§ 26, 27 ch 119 SLA 1990; am §§ 8, 9 ch 188 SLA 1990; am §§ 24 — 27 ch 3 SLA 1992; am §§ 9, 10 ch 59 SLA 1993; am §§ 8 — 11 ch 55 SLA 1994; am §§ 8 — 12 ch 80 SLA 1995; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 143 SLA 1996; am § 13 ch 63 SLA 2001; am §§ 37 — 44 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 17 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 28 ch 124 SLA 2004; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 68 SLA 2005; am §§ 5, 7 ch 56 SLA 2006; am § 27 ch 23 SLA 2007; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 97 SLA 2008; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 85 SLA 2010; am § 110 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§
97, 98 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (o) enacted as (p); relettered in 1993, at which time former (o) was relettered as (p) (now (u)). In 1990, the phrase “the driver's license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license,” was substituted for “this license or nonresident privilege to drive,” in (a) of this section to conform to the language of
AS

28.15.165(a)

, as amended by § 3,
ch. 119, SLA 1990, and other provisions of this title amended by that Act. Section 28,
ch. 119, SLA 1990 added subsections (

l

)-(n), identical to those added by
ch. 188, SLA 1990. Because ch. 188 took effect before ch. 119, the amendments by ch. 119 are not noted in the historical citation for this section.

Subsection (p) was enacted as (q). Relettered in 1995, at which time former subsection (p) was relettered as (q) (now (t)) and internal references in subsections (f), (g), (

l

), and (n) were conformed. Also in 1995, in subsection (p), “AS 28.35.030(o)(4)” was substituted for “AS

28.35.030(m)

(4)” to reflect the 1995 relettering of AS

28.35.030(m)

.

Subsections (q), (r), and (s) were enacted as (r), (s), and (t). Relettered in 2002, at which time former subsection (q) was relettered as (t) and internal cross-references in subsections (g) and (p) were conformed to the relettering.
In 2002, in subsection (p), “
AS

28.35.030(r)

(4)” was substituted for “
AS

28.35.030(o)

(4)” to reflect the 2002 relettering of
AS

28.35.030(o)

, and in subsection (r), “
AS

28.35.030(p)

” was substituted for “
AS

28.35.030(q)

” to reflect the 2002 relettering of
AS

28.35.030(q)

. In 2004, in subsection (p), “
AS

28.35.030(t)

(4)” was substituted for “
AS

28.35.030(r)

(4)” to reflect the 2004 relettering of
AS 28.35.030(r) as
AS

28.35.030(t)

. In 2008, in subsection (p), “
AS

28.35.030(u)

(4)” was substituted for “
AS 28.35.030(t)(4)” to reflect the 2008 relettering of
AS 28.35.030(t) as
AS

28.35.030(u)

. In 2019, in subsection (p), “ AS

28.35.030(w)(4)

” was substituted for “ AS 28.35.030(u)(4)” to reflect the 2019 relettering of
AS 28.35.030(u) as
AS

28.35.030(w)

.

Subsection (t) was enacted as (u).
Relettered in 2008, at which time former subsection (t) was relettered as (u).

In 2018, “AS

43.23.140

” was substituted for “AS

43.23.065

” in subsection (o) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

In subsection (q), the cross-reference to
AS

28.35.030(v)

or (w) was changed to
AS

28.35.030(u)

or (v) to reflect the 2019 relettering of those subsections.

Cross references. —

For effect of the 1993 enactment of (o) of this section on Alaska Rule of Criminal Procedure 32(b), see § 11, ch. 59, SLA 1993 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsection (o), see sec. 185(d)(6), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective January 1, 2009, added the references to the use of ignition interlock devices in subparagraphs (g)(1)(A) — (F) and in paragraph (p)(1), and added subsection (u) [now (t)].

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, in (g)(1)(A), substituted “a minimum of six months” for “a minimum of 12 months during the period of probation”, in (g)(1)(B), substituted “a minimum of 12 months” for “a minimum of 24 months during the period of probation”, in (g)(1)(C), substituted “a minimum of 18 months” for “a minimum of 36 months during the period of probation”, in (g)(1)(D), substituted “for a minimum of 24 months” for “throughout the period of probation”, in (g)(1)(E), substituted “for a minimum of 30 months” for “throughout the period of probation”, in (g)(1)(F), substituted “for a minimum of 36 months” for “throughout the period of probation”; in (g)(2), added (C), and made related changes; in (k), deleted “if the court imposes probation under AS

12.55.102

” following “Notwithstanding (g) of this section,”; in (p)(1), substituted “for a minimum of 60 months” for “throughout the period of probation”, added (p)(2)(C), and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (o), substituted “at a private residence by electronic monitoring under AS

33.30.065

. If electronic monitoring” for “at a community residential center, or if a community residential center”; substituted “imprisonment under (g)(1)(A) of this section shall be served at a private residence by other means as determined by the commissioner of corrections. A person who is serving a sentence of imprisonment required under (g)(1)(A) of this section by electronic monitoring at a private residence may not be subject to a search of the person's dwelling by a peace officer or a person required to administer the electronic monitoring under AS

33.30.065

(a), except upon probable cause” for “at another appropriate place determined by the commissioner of corrections.”; inserted “under AS 33.30.065 or, if electronic monitoring is not available, shall be served by other means as determined by the commissioner of corrections.” following “include electronic monitoring”; substituted “. The” for “provided, however, that the” preceding “cost of imprisonment”; deleted “While at the community residential center or other appropriate place, a person sentenced under (g)(1)(A) of this section shall perform at least 24 hours of community service work.” preceding the last sentence.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (o), rewrote the first and second sentences, which read, “Imprisonment required under (g)(1)(A) of this section shall be served at a private residence by electronic monitoring under AS

33.30.065

. If electronic monitoring is not available, imprisonment under (g)(1)(A) of this section shall be served at a private residence by other means as determined by the commissioner of corrections.”, deleted the former third sentence, which read, “A person who is serving a sentence of imprisonment required under (g)(1)(A) of this section by electronic monitoring at a private residence may not be subject to a search of the person's dwelling by a peace officer or a person required to administer the electronic monitoring under AS

33.30.065

(a), except upon probable cause.”, and deleted “or, if electronic monitoring is not available, shall be served by other means as determined by the commissioner of corrections” following “AS 33.30.065” at the end of the current third sentence; and rewrote (q), which read, “(q) Upon request, the department shall review a driver's license revocation imposed under (p)(3) of this section and may restore the driver's license if

“(1) the license has been revoked for a period of at least 10 years;

“(2) the person has not been convicted of a criminal offense since the license was revoked; and

“(3) the person provides proof of financial responsibility.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 18, ch. 63, SLA 2001, provides that the 2001 amendment to subsection (p) “applies to offenses committed on or after [July 4, 2001], except that references to previous convictions include convictions occurring before, on, or after [July 4, 2001].”

Section 57(b), ch. 60, SLA 2002 provides that the amendments to subsections (a), (e), (g), (h), (j), (o), and (p), made by §§ 37- 43, ch. 60, SLA 2002, and subsections (q), (r), and (s), added by § 44, ch. 60, SLA 2002, apply “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2002, except that references to previous convictions include convictions occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2002.”

Section 32(b), ch. 124, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 amendment of (p) of this section applies “to offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2004, except that previous punishment [, referred to in the subsection,] . . . includes punishment imposed before, on, or after July 1, 2004.”

Section 142(b), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment to (o) of this section applies “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Section 142(i), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment to (q) of this section applies “to revocation of a driver's license occurring before, on, or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring before, on, or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For Governor's transmittal letter on HB 445 (from which
ch. 55, SLA 1994, which amended this section, derived), see 1994 House Journal 2262-2263.

Sec. 28.35.033.
Presumptions and chemical analysis of breath or blood.

Upon the trial of a civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by a person while operating or driving a motor vehicle or operating an aircraft or a watercraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance, the amount of alcohol in the person’s blood or breath at the time alleged shall give rise to the following presumptions:

If there was 0.04 percent or less by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood, or 40 milligrams or less of alcohol per 100 milliliters of the person’s blood, or 0.04 grams or less of alcohol per 210 liters of the person’s breath, it shall be presumed that the person was not under the influence of an alcoholic beverage.

If there was in excess of 0.04 percent but less than 0.08 percent by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood, or in excess of 40 but less than 80 milligrams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of the person’s blood, or in excess of 0.04 grams but less than 0.08 grams of alcohol per 210 liters of the person’s breath, that fact does not give rise to any presumption that the person was or was not under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, but that fact may be considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of an alcoholic beverage.

If there was 0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood, or 80 milligrams or more of alcohol per 100 milliliters of the person’s blood, or 0.08 grams or more of alcohol per 210 liters of the person’s breath, it shall be presumed that the person was under the influence of an alcoholic beverage.

For purposes of this chapter, percent by weight of alcohol in the blood shall be based upon milligrams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood.

Except as provided in AS

28.35.030(s)

, the provisions of (a) of this section may not be construed to limit the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question of whether the person was or was not under the influence of intoxicating liquor.

To be considered valid under the provisions of this section the chemical analysis of the person’s breath or blood shall have been performed according to methods approved by the Department of Public Safety. The Department of Public Safety is authorized to approve satisfactory techniques, methods, and standards of training necessary to ascertain the qualifications of individuals to conduct the analysis. If it is established at trial that a chemical analysis of breath or blood was performed according to approved methods by a person trained according to techniques, methods, and standards of training approved by the Department of Public Safety, there is a presumption that the test results are valid and further foundation for introduction of the evidence is unnecessary.

The person tested may have a physician, or a qualified technician, chemist, registered or advanced practice registered nurse, or other qualified person of the person’s own choosing administer a chemical test in addition to the test administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer. The failure or inability to obtain an additional test by a person does not preclude the admission of evidence relating to the test taken at the direction of a law enforcement officer; the fact that the person under arrest sought to obtain such an additional test, and failed or was unable to do so, is likewise admissible in evidence. The person who administers the chemical test shall clearly and expressly inform the person tested of that person’s right to an independent test described under this subsection, and, if the person being tested requests an independent test, the department shall make reasonable and good-faith efforts to assist the person being tested in contacting a person qualified to perform an independent chemical test of the person’s breath or blood.

Upon the request of the person who submits to a chemical test at the request of a law enforcement officer, full information concerning the test, including the results of it, shall be made available to the person or the person’s attorney.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 1969; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 13 ch 129 SLA 1980; am §§ 18 — 20 ch 117 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 67, § 2 (1987); am § 14 ch 63 SLA 2001; am §§ 45, 46 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 29 ch 124 SLA 2004; am § 46 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For forensic alcohol testing, see 13 AAC 63.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (e), inserted “or advanced practice registered” preceding “nurse”; made stylistic changes.

Sec. 28.35.034.
Surrender of license or permit.

A person whose license or permit to operate or drive a motor vehicle has been revoked under AS

28.15.165

or

28.15.181

shall surrender the license or permit to the department on receipt of notice of the revocation.
After the period of revocation has expired, the person may make application for a new license as provided by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 1969; am § 14 ch 129 SLA 1980; am § 21 ch 77 SLA 1983)

Sec. 28.35.035.
Administration of chemical tests without consent.

If a person is under arrest for an offense arising out of acts alleged to have been committed while the person was operating a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance, and that arrest results from an accident that causes death or physical injury to another person, a chemical test may be administered without the consent of the person arrested to determine the amount of alcohol in that person’s breath or blood or to determine the presence of controlled substances in that person’s blood and urine.

A person who is unconscious or otherwise in a condition rendering that person incapable of refusal is considered not to have withdrawn the consent provided under AS

28.33.031(a)

or AS

28.35.031(a)

or (g) and a chemical test may be administered to determine the amount of alcohol in that person’s breath or blood or to determine the presence of controlled substances in that person’s blood and urine. A person who is unconscious or otherwise incapable of refusal need not be placed under arrest before a chemical test may be administered.

If a chemical test is administered to a person under (a) or (b) of this section, that person is not subject to the penalties for refusal to submit to a chemical test provided by AS

28.35.032

.

History.

(§ 21 ch 117 SLA 1982; am § 22 ch 77 SLA 1983; am § 29 ch 119 SLA 1990; am § 36 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 28 ch 3 SLA 1992; am §§ 12, 13 ch 55 SLA 1994; am § 47 ch 60 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For forensic alcohol testing, see 13 AAC 63.

Sec. 28.35.036.
Forfeiture of vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft.

After conviction of an offense under AS

28.15.291(b)

, AS

28.35.030

, or

28.35.032

, a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft involved in the commission of the offense is subject to forfeiture as provided under AS

28.15.291(b)

, AS

28.35.030

, and

28.35.032

.

Before forfeiture of a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft, the court shall schedule a hearing on the matter and shall notify the state and the convicted person of the time and place set for the hearing. Except for a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft that is required to be forfeited under AS

28.35.030

or

28.35.032

, the court may order the forfeiture of the motor vehicle if the court, sitting without a jury, determines, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the forfeiture of the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft will serve one or more of the following purposes:

deterrence of the convicted person from the commission of future offenses under AS

28.15.291(b)

, AS

28.35.030

, or

28.35.032

;

protection of the safety and welfare of the public;

deterrence of other persons who are potential offenders under AS

28.15.291(b)

, AS 28.35.030, or 28.35.032; or

expression of public condemnation of the serious or aggravated nature of the convicted person’s conduct.

Upon forfeiture of a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft, the court shall require the

surrender of the registration and certificate of title of that motor vehicle; the registration and certificate of title shall be delivered to the department;

convicted person to pay all administrative costs incurred by the state in forfeiting the motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft, including costs incurred by the department, law enforcement personnel, or the court system.

If not released under AS

28.35.037

, a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft forfeited under this section may be disposed of at the discretion of the Department of Public Safety.

Disposal under this subsection includes

sale, as a unit or in parts, including sale at an auction, and the proceeds deposited into the general fund;

transfer to a state or municipal law enforcement agency;

being declared surplus and transferred to the Department of Administration;

being destroyed; or

transfer to a charitable organization; in this paragraph, “charitable organization” means a charity that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code).

History.

(§ 23 ch 77 SLA 1983; am § 30 ch 119 SLA 1990; am § 14 ch 55 SLA 1994; am E.O. No. 99 § 56 (1997); am § 48 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 26 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For statement of intent that the 2002 amendment to this section was intended to follow the forfeiture process established in Anchorage and Fairbanks, see § 1, ch. 60, SLA 2002 in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, deleted “, by way of example and not of limitation,” at the end of the introductory language in (e).